Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 657B.339 is amended to read:
657B.339. (1) As used in  this section, “grant repayment” means a repayment of grant
moneys awarded to an employer under ORS 657B.200 for  which the employer was not eligible.
(2) When in the  judgment of the Director of the Employment Department the best interests of
the Employment Department are served, the director may:
[(1)] (a) Waive, reduce or compromise any balance of $10 or less from a  contribution due under
ORS 657B.150 or a grant repayment due under ORS 657B.320.  [ ; or ]
[(2)] (b) Retain any overpayment of $10 or less from the following amounts paid:
(A) A contribution [ paid] under [ ORS 657B.150 ] this chapter.
(B) An application fee under ORS 657B.210.
(C) A grant repayment collected under ORS 657B.320.
(D) A civil penalty assessed under ORS 657B.332.
(E) A monetary penalty assessed under ORS 657B.925.
(c) Waive, reduce  or compromise any part or all of the interest and penalties, including
civil penalties and monetary penalties, provided by this chapter with respect to  contrib-
utions, grant repayments,  employer-offered benefit plans approved under ORS 657B.210 and
employer violations.
(3) The director may determine that the amount of contribution, grant repayment,  in-
terest or penalty due and  unpaid by an employer on a delinquent account is uncollectible, and
write off such amount, if:
(a) The delinquent amount has been reduced to the status of a lien or  judgment under
the provisions of this chapter and such lien or judgment has expired; or
(b)(A) The employer no longer has an active business in Oregon and has not had  an ac-
tive business within the three most recently completed calendar years; and
(B) There is little or no likelihood of recovering the amount due.
(4) In making the determination under subsection (3) of this section that a  delinquent
account is uncollectible, the director shall consider, among other factors:
(a) The administrative costs of  continued collection efforts in relation to the amount due;
(b) The accessibility of the employer for effective collection actions; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 859 (SB 859-INTRO) Page 1
(c) The employer’s financial condition and ability to pay  the amount due, both current
and projected.
(5) A record shall  be made showing the reasons for waiving, reducing, compromising or
writing off amounts under this section. Such record shall be retained for a period of seven
years from the date the account was written off.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 657B.339 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to:
(1) Contributions due or paid on or after January 1, 2023.
(2) Grant repayments due or paid on or after September 3, 2023.
(3) Application fees paid before, on or after January 1, 2023.
(4) Penalties and interest assessed on or after January 1, 2023.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate February 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 859 (SB 859-INTRO) Page 2